District of Columbia statutes.
43-117

Register of burials; contents.

It shall be the duty of the owner or owners of any cemetery or cemeteries in the District to cause to be kept in the office of the superintendent or person in charge of such cemetery or cemeteries a register showing the number of each lot, the name, age, cause of death, and date of burial of each person or persons buried in any such lot or grave space, and the number of the burial permit authorizing such burial. In cases of disinterment said register shall show the date of such disinterment and the number of the official permit therefor opposite the name of the person whose remains are disinterred. Such register shall be at all times open to inspection by duly authorized representatives of the Department of Health and of the Police Department of said District.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1296, ch. 854, § 673
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191,§§ 8(a), 65(a), 53 DCR 6794
1981 Ed., § 27-117.
1973 Ed., § 27-116.
D.C. Law 16-191 substituted “Health” for “Human Services”.